Massachusetts, session 194th, S1100.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 53 of chapter 208 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “incomes”, in line 14, the following words:- ", if
federally tax deductible, or, if not federally tax deductible, the recipient’s need or 23 per cent to
28 per cent of the difference between the parties’ gross incomes, as".
of 1